Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 11 Foreign Trade Zones

§ 40-11-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

40-11-101

through

40-11-105

], the term “public corporation” means the state of Wyoming, any municipality, county or other political subdivision thereof, any public agency of this state or any municipality of one or more other states. The term “act of congress” means the act of congress, entitled “An act to provide for the establishment, operation and maintenance of foreign trade zones in ports of entry of the United States, to expedite and encourage foreign commerce, and for other purposes”, 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a to 81u.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 48, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-97.

§ 40-11-102.
Application by public corporation to establish and operate zone; designation of agency to apply on behalf of state.

Any public corporation may make application for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign trade zone in accordance with the act of congress and amendments thereto.

The Wyoming business council is the public entity designated and authorized to apply, on behalf of the state of Wyoming, for foreign trade zone authority, sub-zone authority or port of entry pursuant to the act of congress and regulations issued pursuant to the act.

The designation of the Wyoming business council to apply on behalf of the state of Wyoming for foreign trade zone or sub-zone authority shall not prohibit other public corporations from applying for foreign trade zone authority pursuant to the act of congress.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 48, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 40-98; Laws 1986, ch. 14, § 1; 1998, ch. 6, § 3.

Meaning of “act of congress.” —

For the definition of “act of congress,” referred to in this section, see §

40-11-101

.

§ 40-11-103.
Application by private corporation to establish and operate.

Any private corporation organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign trade zone in accordance with the act of congress may make application for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign trade zone in accordance with the act of congress.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 48, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 40-99.

Meaning of “act of congress.” —

See note following §

40-11-102

.

§ 40-11-104.
Establishment and operation by corporation; conditions and restrictions.

Any public or private corporation authorized by this chapter to make such application and whose application is granted pursuant to the terms of the act of congress may establish, operate, and maintain the foreign trade zone:

Subject to the conditions and restrictions of the act of congress, and any amendments thereto;

Under such rules and regulations and for the period of time that may be prescribed by the board established by the act of congress to carry out the provisions of the act [§§

40-11-101

through

40-11-105

].

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 48, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 40-100.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “act of congress.” —

See note following §

40-11-102

.

§ 40-11-105.
Powers of public corporation to provide indemnity and deposit money with United States.

If authorized to establish, operate and maintain a foreign trade zone, a public corporation may, in addition to its other powers:

It may, for itself, provide for such indemnity or assurance to the United States or its agencies as they may request;

Deposit such sums of money with the United States as the United States or its agencies may request, providing such money is available therefor by direct appropriation or otherwise.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 48, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 40-101.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.